Tennessee, session 114, HB1654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-4-102, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
The governor shall cause proposed legislation to be forwarded to the chair of the
government operations committee of the senate and the chair of the committee of the
house of representatives having jurisdiction over matters related to government
operations during the first regular session of the general assembly to meet following any
such transfer of functions. Such legislation must revise provisions of the Tennessee
Code Annotated to reflect any such changes made by executive order pursuant to this
section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1654
010125
- 1 -